fi: Serpentiinisprayn suositeltava käyttöpinta: Automaali; Kangas; Lasi; Hiukset; Turvallinen sisäkäyttöön (helposti puhdistettava); Metalli; Ei suositella herkille pinnoille; Vain ulkokäyttöön; Maalatut pinnat; Paperi/kartonki; Muovi; Iho; Puu; Muu
bg-BG: Препоръчителна повърхност за парти спрей нишки: Автомобилна боя; Тъкан; Стъкло; Коса; Безопасно за закрито (лесно почистване); Метал; Не се препоръчва за деликатни повърхности; Само за открито; Боядисани повърхности; Хартия/картон; Пластмаса; Кожа; Дърво; Друго
ro-RO: Suprafață recomandată pentru sprayul cu spumă: Vopsea auto; Material textil; Sticlă; Păr; Sigur pentru interior (ușor de curățat); Metal; Nerecomandat pentru suprafețe delicate; Doar pentru exterior; Suprafețe vopsite; Hârtie/Carton; Plastic; Piele; Lemn; Altele
ru: Рекомендуемая поверхность для аэрозольной нити: Автомобильная краска; Ткань; Стекло; Волосы; Безопасно для помещений (легко моется); Металл; Не рекомендуется для деликатных поверхностей; Только для использования на улице; Окрашенные поверхности; Бумага/картон; Пластик; Кожа; Дерево; Другое
sk-SK: Odporúčaný povrch na aplikáciu spreja: Lak vozidla; Látka; Sklo; Vlasy; Bezpečné do interiéru (ľahko sa čistí); Kov; Neodporúča sa pre jemné povrchy; Len do exteriéru; Maľované povrchy; Papier/kartón; Plast; Pokožka; Drevo; Iné
ko: 스프레이 스트링 권장 표면: 자동차 페인트; 원단; 유리; 머리카락; 실내 사용 안전(간편한 세척); 금속; 민감한 표면에 권장하지 않음; 실외 전용; 페인트칠된 표면; 종이/카드스톡; 플라스틱; 피부; 나무; 기타
sv: Rekommenderad yta för spraysträng: Billack; Tyg; Glas; Hår; Säker för inomhusbruk (lätt att rengöra); Metall; Rekommenderas inte för ömtåliga ytor; Endast utomhusbruk; Målade ytor; Papper/kartong; Plast; Hud; Trä; Övrigt
es: Superficie recomendada para aerosoles de serpentinas: Pintura automotriz; Tela; Vidrio; Cabello; Seguro para interiores (fácil de limpiar); Metal; No recomendado para superficies delicadas; Solo para exteriores; Superficies pintadas; Papel/cartulina; Plástico; Piel; Madera; Otro
ja: スプレーストリング推奨面: 車の塗装面; 布; ガラス; 髪; 屋内安全 (お手入れ簡単); 金属; デリケートな表面には非推奨; 屋外専用; 塗装面; 紙 / 厚紙; プラスチック; 肌; 木材; その他
el: Προτεινόμενη επιφάνεια χρήσης σπρέι σερπαντίνας: Χρώμα αυτοκινήτου; Ύφασμα; Γυαλί; Μαλλιά; Ασφαλές για εσωτερικούς χώρους (εύκολος καθαρισμός); Μέταλλο; Δεν συνιστάται για ευαίσθητες επιφάνειες; Μόνο για εξωτερικούς χώρους; Βαμμένες επιφάνειες; Χαρτί/χαρτόνι; Πλαστικό; Δέρμα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
cs: Doporučený povrch pro provázek ve spreji: Autolak; Látka; Sklo; Vlasy; Bezpečný pro interiér (snadno čistitelný); Kov; Nedoporučuje se na choulostivé povrchy; Pouze pro venkovní použití; Lakované povrchy; Papír/karton; Plast; Kůže; Dřevo; Jiné
pt-PT: Superfícies recomendadas para o fio de spray: Pintura automóvel; Tecido; Vidro; Cabelo; Seguro para interiores (fácil limpeza); Metal; Não recomendado para superfícies delicadas; Apenas para exteriores; Superfícies pintadas; Papel/cartolina; Plástico; Pele; Madeira; Outro
vi: Dây phun được khuyến nghị cho bề mặt: Sơn ô tô; Vải; Kính; Tóc; An toàn trong nhà (dễ làm sạch); Kim loại; Không khuyến nghị cho bề mặt dễ hỏng; Chỉ dùng ngoài trời; Bề mặt sơn; Giấy/bìa cứng; Nhựa; Da; Gỗ; Khác
da: Anbefalet overflade til sprayserpentiner: Autolak; Stof; Glas; Hår; Sikker indendørs (let rengøring); Metal; Anbefales ikke til sarte overflader; Kun udendørs; Malede overflader; Papir/karton; Plast; Hud; Træ; Andet
zh-TW: 噴彩罐建議表面: 汽車烤漆; 布料; 玻璃; 頭髮; 安全用於室內 (易清潔); 金屬; 不建議用於脆弱表面; 僅限戶外使用; 上漆表面; 紙張/卡紙; 塑膠; 皮膚; 木材; 其他
th: พื้นผิวที่แนะนำสำหรับสายฉีดน้ำ: สีพ่นรถยนต์; ผ้า; กระจก; เส้นผม; ปลอดภัยสำหรับในร่ม (ทำความสะอาดง่าย); โลหะ; ไม่แนะนำสำหรับพื้นผิวบอบบาง; กลางแจ้งเท่านั้น; พื้นผิวทาสี; กระดาษ/กระดาษการ์ด; พลาสติก; ผิวหนัง; ไม้; อื่นๆ
hu: Szerpentin spray javasolt felület: Autófesték; Szövet; Üveg; Haj; Beltéren biztonságos (könnyen tisztítható); Fém; Érzékeny felületekre nem ajánlott; Csak kültéri; Festett felületek; Papír/karton; Műanyag; Bőr; Fa; Egyéb
sl-SI: Priporočena površina za nitke v razpršilu: Avtomobilski lak; Tkanina; Steklo; Lasje; Varno za notranje prostore (enostavno čiščenje); Kovina; Ni priporočljivo za občutljive površine; Samo za zunanjo uporabo; Pobarvane površine; Papir/karton; Plastika; Koža; Les; Drugo
tr: Sprey ip önerilen yüzey: Otomotiv boyası; Kumaş; Cam; Saç; İç mekanda güvenli (kolay temizlenir); Metal; Hassas yüzeyler için önerilmez; Sadece dış mekan; Boyalı yüzeyler; Kağıt/karton; Plastik; Cilt; Ahşap; Diğer
zh-CN: 喷丝适用表面: 汽车漆面; 织物; 玻璃; 头发; 室内安全适用（易清洁）; 金属; 不建议用于娇贵表面; 仅限户外适用; 涂漆表面; 纸张/卡片纸; 塑料; 皮肤; 木材; 其他
hr-HR: Poprskajte preporučanu površinu: Auto-boja; Tkanina; Staklo; Kosa; Sigurno za zatvorene prostore (lako se čisti); Metal; Ne preporučuje se za osjetljive površine; Samo za otvorene prostore; Obojene površine; Papir/karton; Plastika; Koža; Drvo; Ostalo
en: Spray string recommended surface: Automotive paint; Fabric; Glass; Hair; Indoor safe (easy clean); Metal; Not recommended for delicate surfaces; Outdoor only; Painted surfaces; Paper/cardstock; Plastic; Skin; Wood; Other
de: Empfohlene Oberfläche für Sprühschlangen: Autolack; Stoff; Glas; Haar; Sicher für Innenräume (leicht zu reinigen); Metall; Nicht für empfindliche Oberflächen empfohlen; Nur für den Außenbereich; Lackierte Oberflächen; Papier/Karton; Kunststoff; Haut; Holz; Sonstige
it: Superficie consigliata per la schiuma filante spray: Vernice per auto; Tessuto; Vetro; Capelli; Sicuro per interni (facile da pulire); Metallo; Sconsigliato per superfici delicate; Solo per esterni; Superfici verniciate; Carta/cartoncino; Plastica; Pelle; Legno; Altro
lt-LT: Rekomenduojamas purškiamų siūlų paviršius: Automobilių dažai; Audinys; Stiklas; Plaukai; Saugus naudoti patalpose (lengvai valomas); Metalas; Nerekomenduojama jautriems paviršiams; Tik lauke; Dažyti paviršiai; Popierius / kartonas; Plastikas; Oda; Mediena; Kita
nb: Anbefalt underlag for spraysnorer: Billakk; Stoff; Glass; Hår; Trygg innendørs (enkel å rengjøre); Metall; Anbefales ikke for ømfintlige overflater; Kun utendørs; Malte overflater; Papir/kartong; Plast; Hud; Tre; Annet
pl: Zalecana powierzchnia dla serpentyny w sprayu: Lakier samochodowy; Tkanina; Szkło; Włosy; Bezpieczne do wnętrz (łatwe czyszczenie); Metal; Niezalecane do delikatnych powierzchni; Tylko na zewnątrz; Powierzchnie malowane; Papier/karton; Plastik; Skóra; Drewno; Inne
fr: Surface recommandée pour la bombe à serpentins: Peinture automobile; Tissu; Verre; Cheveux; Utilisation intérieure (nettoyage facile); Métal; Non recommandé pour les surfaces délicates; Extérieur uniquement; Surfaces peintes; Papier/carton; Plastique; Peau; Bois; Autre
nl: Serpentinespray aanbevolen oppervlak: Autolak; Stof; Glas; Haar; Veilig voor binnen (makkelijk schoon te maken); Metaal; Niet aanbevolen voor delicate oppervlakken; Alleen buiten; Geschilderde oppervlakken; Papier/karton; Plastic; Huid; Hout; Overige
pt-BR: Serpentina em spray superfície recomendada: Pintura automotiva; Tecido; Vidro; Cabelo; Seguro para ambientes internos (fácil limpeza); Metal; Não recomendado para superfícies delicadas; Apenas para áreas externas; Superfícies pintadas; Papel/cartolina; Plástico; Pele; Madeira; Outro